Utah statutes.
61-1-103.   Procedure for disclosure.

(1)  To be a reporter for purposes of this part, the individual shall:

(a)  provide original information to the division or commission;

(b)  reasonably believe that the act that is disclosed by the original information is a violation of this chapter; and

(c)  provide the original information to the division or commission:

(i)  in writing; and

(ii)  in accordance with the procedures established by rule made by the division in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(2) (a)  Notwithstanding Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, and except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the division, commission, or an employee of the division may not disclose information that could reasonably be expected to reveal the identity of a reporter.

(b)  This Subsection (2) is not intended to limit, and may not be construed to limit, the ability of the attorney general or division to present evidence to a grand jury or to share evidence with potential witnesses or defendants in the course of an ongoing criminal investigation.



Enacted by Chapter 318, 2011 General Session

